District of Columbia statutes.
42-4043

Authorization to enter into contracts for tenant assistance payments; determination of eligibility; procedure upon determination of eligibility

Expired.

Editor's Notes

Expiration of subchapter: Section 907 of D.C. Law 3-131 provided that all subchapters of this chapter, except subchapter V, shall terminate on April 30, 1985.